cs: Elektronika > Sítě > Rozbočovače a přepínače > Modulární přepínače: Rozšiřovací moduly síťových přepínačů; Ventilátorové moduly přepínačů; Napájecí zdroje přepínačů; Sady pro stohování přepínačů
sv: Elektronik > Nätverk > Hubbar och switchrar > Modulära switchar: Nätverksswitchens expansionsmoduler; Switchfläktmoduler; Switchströmförsörjningar; Switchstaplingskit
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Rede > Hubs e interruptores > Switches modulares: Módulos de expansão para switch de rede; Módulos de ventilação para switch; Fontes de alimentação para switch; Kit de empilhamento para switch
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 網路 > 集線器和交換器 > 模組化交換器: 網路交換機擴展模組; 交換機風扇模組; 交換機電源供應器; 交換機堆疊套組
hr-HR: Elektronika > Umrežavanje > Čvorišta i sklopke > Modularni prekidači: Moduli za proširenje mrežnog prekidača; Moduli ventilatora za Switch; Napajanje za Switch; Kompleti za slaganje Switcha
lt-LT: Elektronika > Tinklai > Šakotuvai ir jungikliai > Moduliniai jungikliai: Tinklo jungiklio išplėtimo moduliai; Jungiklio ventiliatorių moduliai; Jungiklio maitinimo šaltiniai; Jungiklių sujungimo rinkiniai
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ระบบเครือข่าย > ฮับและสวิตช์ > สวิตช์แบบโมดูลาร์: โมดูลขยายสวิตช์เครือข่าย; โมดูลพัดลมสวิตช์; แหล่งจ่ายไฟสวิตช์; ชุดเชื่อมต่อสวิตช์แบบซ้อน
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Nối mạng > Thiết bị kết nối trung tâm và chia cổng mạng > Thiết bị chuyển mạch mô-đun: Mô-đun mở rộng switch mạng; Mô-đun quạt switch; Nguồn điện switch; Bộ kit xếp chồng switch
ru: Электроника > Сетевое оборудование > Коммутаторы > Модульные коммутаторы: Модули расширения сетевых коммутаторов; Модули вентиляторов коммутаторов; Блоки питания коммутаторов; Комплекты складывания коммутаторов
fr: Appareil électronique > Réseaux > Hubs et commutateurs > Commutateurs modulaires: Modules d’extension pour commutateur réseau; Modules de ventilation pour commutateur; Blocs d’alimentation pour commutateur; Kits d’empilement pour commutateur
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 网络 > 集线器与交换器 > 模块化交换机: 网络交换机扩展模块; 交换机风扇模块; 交换机电源; 交换机堆叠套件
tr: Elektronik > Ağ Sistemleri > Hublar ve Anahtarlar > Modüler Anahtarlar: Ağ Anahtarı Genişletme Modülleri; Anahtar Fan Modülleri; Anahtar Güç Kaynakları; Anahtar İstifleme Kitleri
ko: 전자기기 > 네트워킹 > 허브/스위치 > 모듈식 스위치: 네트워크 스위치 확장 모듈; 스위치 팬 모듈; 스위치 전원 공급 장치; 스위치 스태킹 키트
en: Electronics > Networking > Hubs & Switches > Modular Switches: Network Switch Expansion Modules; Switch Fan Modules; Switch Power Supplies; Switch Stacking Kits
hu: Elektronika > Hálózatépítés > Hubok és kapcsolók > Moduláris kapcsolók: Hálózati kapcsoló bővítőmodulok; Kapcsoló-ventilátormodulok; Kapcsolótápegységek; Kapcsoló-összekötő készletek
nb: Elektronikk > Nettverk > Huber og switcher > Modulære svitsjer: Nettverkssvitsj-utvidermoduler; Viftemoduler for svitsjer; Strømforsyninger for svitsjer; Stablingsett for svitsjer
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Ligação em rede > Cubos e interruptores > Interruptores modulares: Módulos de expansão de switch de rede; Módulos de ventoinha de switch; Fontes de alimentação de switch; Kit de empilhamento de switch
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Δικτύωση > Κόμβοι & διακόπτες > Αρθρωτοί διακόπτες: Ενότητες επέκτασης διακόπτη δικτύου; Ενότητες ανεμιστήρα διακόπτη; Τροφοδοτικά διακόπτη; Κιτ στοίβαξης διακόπτη
pl: Elektronika > Sieci > Huby i switche > Przełączniki modułowe: Moduły rozszerzenia przełącznika sieciowego; Moduły wentylatorów przełącznika; Zasilacze przełącznika; Zestawy do układania przełączników
ja: 電子機器 > ネットワーク > ハブ・スイッチ > モジュラースイッチ: ネットワークスイッチ拡張モジュール; スイッチファンモジュール; スイッチ用電源ユニット; スイッチスタッキングキット
nl: Elektronica > Netwerken > Hubs en switches > Modular switches: Netwerkswitch-uitbreidingsmodules; Switch ventilatormodules; Switch voedingen; Switch stackingset
fi: Elektroniikka > Verkkojen toteutus > Hubit ja kytkimet > Modulaariset kytkimet: Verkkokytkinlaajennusmoduuli; Kytkintuuletinmoduuli; Kytkinvirtalähde; Kytkinpinoamiskokonaisuus
bg-BG: Електроника > Мрежово оборудване > Хъбове и комутатори > Модулни комутатори: Модули за разширение на мрежов суич; Вентилаторни модули за суич; Захранвания за суич; Комплекти за свързване на суичове
sk-SK: Elektronika > Siete > Rozbočovače a prepínače > Modulárne prepínače: Rozširujúce moduly sieťových switchov; Ventilátorové moduly switchov; Napájacie zdroje switchov; Súpravy na stohovanie switchov
es: Electrónica > Redes > Concentradores y conmutadores > Interruptores modulares: Módulos de expansión de switch de red; Módulos de ventilador de switch; Fuentes de alimentación de switch; Kit de apilamiento de switch
sl-SI: Elektronika > Mreženje > Vozlišča in stikala > Modularna stikala: Razširitveni moduli za omrežna stikala; Moduli ventilatorjev za stikala; Napajalni viri za stikala; Kompleti za zlaganje stikal
da: Elektronik > Netværk > Hubs og switches > Modulære switches: Netværksswitch-udvidelsesmoduler; Switch-blæsermoduler; Switch-strømforsyninger; Switch-stablingssæt
ro-RO: Electronice > Rețele > Hub-uri și comutatoare > Comutatoare modulare: Module de expansiune pentru switch-uri de rețea; Module ventilator pentru switch-uri; Surse de alimentare pentru switch-uri; Kituri de stivuire pentru switch-uri
it: Elettronica > Rete > Hub e switch > Interruttori modulari: Moduli di espansione degli switch di rete; Moduli ventola per switch; Alimentatori per switch; Kit di impilamento per switch
de: Elektronik > Netzwerktechnik > Hubs & Schalter > Modulare Schalter: Netzwerk-Switch-Erweiterungsmodule; Switch-Lüftermodule; Switch-Netzteile; Switch-Stapelsätze